Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.010

Fee for examination.

Examination and investigation fees, together with semiannual assessments of state trust companies and all other miscellaneous fees for trust institutions, are governed by RCW 30A.04.070 of the Washington commercial bank act and by rules adopted by the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 334.]